Wisconsin, session 2025, AB576.
do enact as follows:AB576,11Section 1. 86.107 of the statutes is created to read:AB576,2,2286.107 Automatic registration plate reader ban. (1) In this section:AB576,2,53(a) “Automatic registration plate reader” means a device that has the capacity 4to capture an image from a registration plate and convert the image into computer-5readable data.AB576,2,76(b) “Registration plate” means a plate specified under s. 341.12 or under a 7similar law of another state.AB576,2,98(2) No person may use an automatic registration plate reader except under 9any of the following circumstances:AB576,2,1110(a) The automatic registration plate reader is used by a parking enforcement 11facility to regulate the use of the parking facility.AB576,2,1512(b) The automatic registration plate reader is being used to control access to 13an area, if the area is enclosed by clear boundaries, access to the area is limited and 14not open to the public, and entry to the area is through only specific access-control 15points.AB576,3,216(c) The automatic registration plate reader is installed at an entrance at a 17weigh station facility and is being used by a state or local governmental agency for 1electronically verifying registration, logs, or other compliance data or to provide 2more efficient movement of commercial vehicles on a state highway.AB576,3,33(3) Data captured under sub. (2) shall be limited to the following:AB576,3,44(a) The registration plate number and issuing state.AB576,3,55(b) The date and time the data were captured and the location of the vehicle.AB576,3,66(c) Pictures of registration plates, vehicles, and areas surrounding the vehicle.AB576,3,97(4) Unless the data are subject to s. 968.376, data captured under sub. (2) may 8not be shared except for a purpose listed under sub. (2) and may not be preserved for 9more than 90 days.AB576,210Section 2. 968.376 of the statutes is created to read:AB576,3,1211968.376 Warrants for data from private security cameras and 12automatic registration plate readers. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB576,3,1613(a) “Automatic registration plate reader” has the meaning given in s. 86.107 14(1) (a). “Automatic registration plate reader” does not include a body camera worn 15by a law enforcement officer or a dashboard camera on a vehicle owned or operated 16by a law enforcement agency for official purposes.AB576,3,1817(b) “Private security camera” means a privately owned camera that is 18mounted for security purposes and is activated by motion or by a doorbell.AB576,3,2319(2) Prohibition. Except as provided in sub. (4), no law enforcement officer, as 20defined in s. 165.85 (2) (c), may use data captured from a private security camera or 21from an automatic registration plate reader without first obtaining a warrant 22under sub. (3). A law enforcement officer who violates this subsection is guilty of a 23misdemeanor and subject to a fine not to exceed $10,000.AB576,4,424(3) Warrant. Upon the request of the attorney general or a district attorney 1and upon a showing of probable cause, a judge may issue a warrant requiring a 2person who owns a private security camera or an automatic registration plate 3reader to provide data captured by the device within a reasonable time that is 4established in the warrant.AB576,4,95(4) Exception. The prohibition in sub. (2) does not apply to a law 6enforcement officer who uses data captured by a private security camera or an 7automatic registration plate reader if an emergency involving danger of death or 8serious physical injury to any person exists and the data are relevant to preventing 9the death or injury or to mitigating the injury.AB576,4,1310(5) Basis, application for, and issuance of warrant. Section 968.12 (2) 11and (3) applies to the basis and application for and issuance of a warrant under sub. 12(3) as it applies to the basis and application for and issuance of a search warrant 13under s. 968.12.AB576,4,1714(6) Manner of service and time for service. (a) A warrant issued under 15this section may be served in the manner provided for serving a summons under s. 16801.11 (5) or, if delivery can reasonably be proved, by U.S. mail or electronic 17transmission.AB576,4,1918(b) A warrant issued under this section shall be served not more than 5 days 19after the date of issuance.AB576,4,2320(7) Motion to quash. The person on whom a warrant issued under this 21section is served may file a motion to quash the warrant with the judge who issued 22the warrant. If the person files the motion within the time for production of data, 23the judge shall hear and decide the motion within 8 days after the motion is filed.AB576,5,224(8) Law enforcement presence not required. The presence of a law 1enforcement officer is not required for service or execution of a warrant issued 2under this section.AB576,5,63(9) Return. A warrant issued under this section shall be returned to the 4court not later than 5 days after the data described in the warrant are received by 5the attorney general, district attorney, or law enforcement agency, whichever is 6designated in the warrant.AB576,5,147(10) Secrecy. (a) A warrant issued under this section shall be issued with all 8practicable secrecy, and the request, complaint, affidavit, or testimony upon which 9it is based may not be filed with the clerk or made public until the warrant has been 10executed and returned to the court. The judge may issue an order sealing the 11warrant and the request, complaint, affidavit, or testimony upon which it is based. 12The judge may issue an order prohibiting the person on whom the warrant is served 13from disclosing the existence of the warrant to any person or owner of property 14captured in the data unless the judge subsequently authorizes such disclosure.AB576,5,1815(b) All data returned under sub. (9) shall be destroyed at the conclusion of all 16criminal actions taken in the matter involving the data or at the conclusion of the 17criminal investigation if the investigation does not result in criminal charges being 18filed.AB576,5,2019(c) Facial recognition software may not be used on any data returned to the 20court under this section.AB576,5,2321(11) Immunity. A person on whom a warrant issued under this section is 22served is immune from civil liability for acts or omissions in providing data in 23accordance with the terms of the warrant.AB576,6,224(12) Technical irregularities. Evidence disclosed under a warrant issued 1under this section may not be suppressed because of technical irregularities or 2errors not affecting the substantial rights of the defendant.AB576,33Section 3. Initial applicability.AB576,6,54(1) The treatment of s. 968.376 first applies to data captured on the effective 5date of this subsection.AB576,6,66